District of Columbia statutes.
9-203.04

Minor streets.

Except as provided in § 9-203.03(b) and (c), and any regulations issued pursuant to § 9-203.03(b) or (c), in any 1 block length, a minor street shall be 75 feet wide, though land may be acquired at a width of 55 feet with building restriction lines set 10 feet back on both sides of the street lines.

Mar. 10, 1983, D.C. Law 4-201, § 304, 30 DCR 148
Oct. 22, 2008, D.C. Law 17-246, § 2(c), 55 DCR 9010
This section is referenced in § 9-203.03.
1981 Ed., § 7-444.
D.C. Law 17-246 substituted “Except as provided in § 9-203.03(b) and (c), and any regulations issued pursuant to § 9-203.03(b) or (c), in any” for “In any”.

Approval of new streets or alleys: Section 2 of D.C. Law 8-178 provided that the Council accepts the dedication of land and approves the establishment of building restriction lines necessary to create minor streets within Lot 2 in Square 5957, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 89-276, upon the filing of certain covenants in the Recorder of Deeds Division. Section 4(b) of D.C. Law 8-178 provided that if the covenant required by § 2 of the act is not filed within 2 years of October 2, 1990, the act shall expire.

Creation of street: Section 2 of D.C. Law 7-102 provided that pursuant to § 9-203.04 the Council of the District of Columbia accepts the dedication of land and approves the establishment of building restriction lines necessary to create a minor street in Square 4325 connecting 31st Place, N.E., and Fort Lincoln Drive, N.E., in Fort Lincoln New Town, as shown in the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 85-189.

Approval of new streets or alleys: Section 3 of D.C. Law 8-81 provided that the Council accepted the dedication of land for minor streets in Squares 5041 and 5056; approved the set-aside of portions of public alleys for minor streets in Squares 5041 and 5056, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 88-212; approved the set-aside of a portion of Grant Street, N.E., for Parkside Place, N.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 88-212; and approved the establishment of building restriction lines for minor streets in Squares 5041 and 5056, as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 88-212.

Section 2 of D.C. Law 10-197 provided that the Council accepts the dedication of land and approves the establishment of building restriction lines necessary to create a minor street in Square 5969 near Mississippi Avenue, S.E., and 4th Street, S.E., as shown on the Surveyor’s plat filed under S.O. 92-124.